Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1019.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The time within which Little Compton Scout Association, Inc. incorporated
on December 13, 1965, shall file the reports for the years 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007,
2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023,
2024, and 2025 , as required under the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 7 of the General Laws, 1956,
is hereby extended to the 31st day of December, A.D., 2025, if said corporation shall file in the
office of the secretary of state before December 31, 2025, the reports which it should have filed in
the said years and shall pay to the secretary of state the filing fees therefor, having previously
thereto paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state such sum as the attorney general shall
decide should be paid by said corporation as a compromise for the penalty or penalties for its failure
to file such reports then the forfeiture or revocation of the charter of said corporation shall
thereupon, to wit, upon the filing of said reports and the payment of said fees, be vacated and said
corporation shall thereupon be entitled to all of the privileges, benefits and powers and subject to
the same duties and liabilities as though no forfeiture or revocation of its said charter had taken
place.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002776
========